Tennessee, session 114, HB2083.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-902(b), is amended by deleting
subdivisions (b)(1)-(3) and substituting:
(1) To reduce time to permanency of children five (5) years of age or younger,
with priority given to cases involving children younger than three (3) years of age, by
surrounding at-risk families with support services;
(2) To reduce incidences of repeat maltreatment among children five (5) years of
age or younger;
(3) To reduce the long-term and short-term effects of traumatic experiences
occurring when a child is five (5) years of age or younger on a child's brain development;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2083
010691
- 1 -